Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-145.03
Employers; other liabilities not affected.

Sections 48-125.01, 48-145.01, and 48-145.02 shall not affect any other liability of the employer under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.

Laws 1971, LB 572, § 21;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 70.